Utah statutes.
4-9-5.4.   Adopting uniform regulation for the voluntary registration of
servicepersons and service agencies for commercial weighing and measuring
devices.
Unless modified by the department, the Uniform Regulation for the Voluntary
Registration of Servicepersons and Service Agencies for Commercial Weighing
and Measuring Devices, adopted by the National Conference on Weights and
Measures in Handbook 130, Uniform Laws and Regulations in the Areas of Legal
Metrology and Engine Fuel Quality, National Institute of Standards and
Technology, shall apply to the registration of servicepersons and service
agencies in the state.
